District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Community Health Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985, effective
March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-99; D.C. Official Code § 3-1201.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 102(11)(A) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1201.02(11)(A)) is amended by striking
the phrase “in accordance with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s published
guidelines and recommended immunization schedules” and inserting the phrase “in accordance
with the published guidelines and recommended immunization schedules of the Advisory
Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or a
competent medical or public health organization designated by the Director of the Department of
Health through a public notice” in its place.
(b) Section 755(a-1) (D.C. Official Code § 3-1207.55(a-1)) is amended by striking the
phrase “in accordance with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s published
guidelines and recommended immunization schedules” and inserting the phrase “in accordance
with the published guidelines and recommended immunization schedules of the Advisory
Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or a
competent medical or public health organization designated by the Director of the Department of
Health through a public notice” in its place.
Sec. 3. Section 2 of the Consent for Vaccinations of Minors Amendment Act of 2022,
effective March 10, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-312; D.C. Official Code § 7-1653.01), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “recommended by the United States
Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices (“ACIP”), and where receipt of the vaccine is in
accordance with ACIP's recommended immunization schedule.” and inserting the phrase
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“recommended by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention (“ACIP”) or a competent medical or public health organization
designated by the Director of the Department of Health (“Director”) through a public notice, and
where receipt of the vaccine is in accordance with the recommended immunization schedule of
ACIP or the competent medical or public health organization designated by the Director.” in its
place.
(b) Subsection (b)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “recommended by ACIP in
accordance with ACIP’s recommended immunization schedule” and inserting the phrase
“recommended by ACIP or the competent medical or public health organization designated by
the Director, in accordance with the recommended immunization schedule of ACIP or the
competent medical or public health organization designated by the Director” in its place.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2